Utah statutes.
70A-9a-310.    When filing required to perfect security interest or
agricultural lien -- Security interests and agricultural liens to which filing
provisions do not apply.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2) and Subsection 70A-
9a-312(2), a financing statement must be filed to perfect all security
interests and agricultural liens.
(2)  The filing of a financing statement is not necessary to perfect a
security interest:
(a)  that is perfected under Subsection 70A-9a-308(4), (5), (6), or (7);
(b)  that is perfected under Section 70A-9a-309 when it attaches;
(c)  in property subject to a statute, regulation, or treaty described in
Subsection 70A-9a-311(1);
(d)  in goods in possession of a bailee which is perfected under Subsection
70A-9a-312(4)(a) or (b);
(e)  in certificated securities, documents, goods, or instruments which is
perfected without filing, control, or possession under Subsection 70A-
9a-312(5), (6), or (7);
(f)  in collateral in the secured party's possession under Section 70A-9a-313;
(g)  in a certificated security which is perfected by delivery of the security
certificate to the secured party under Section 70A-9a-313;
(h)  in deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper, electronic documents,
investment property, or letter-of-credit rights which is perfected by control
under Section 70A-9a-314;
(i)  in proceeds which is perfected under Section 70A-9a-315; or
(j)  that is perfected under Section 70A-9a-316.
(3)  If a secured party assigns a perfected security interest or agricultural
lien, a filing under this chapter is not required to continue the perfected
status of the security interest against creditors of and transferees from the
original debtor.
